Hawaii statutes.
[§431:2D-112] Coordination with other
states through the National Association of Insurance Commissioners. The
commissioner shall share information and coordinate the insurance division's
market analysis and examination efforts with other states through the National
Association of Insurance Commissioners. [L 2007, c 227, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next